Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2452
Termination of appointment; death or disability.

The death of a personal representative or the appointment of a guardian or conservator for the estate of a personal representative terminates his appointment. Until appointment and qualification of a successor or special representative to replace the deceased or protected representative, the representative of the estate of the deceased or protected personal representative, if any, has the duty to protect the estate possessed and being administered by his decedent or ward at the time his appointment terminates, has the power to perform acts necessary for protection and shall account for and deliver the estate assets to a successor or special personal representative upon his appointment and qualification.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 130, UPC § 3-609.